North Carolina, session 2025, SB578.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Fellowship Program Established. – There is established the North
Carolina Communities Advancing Real Development by Investing in Newly Accomplished
Leaders, or CARDINAL, Corps Program (Program) to expand opportunities for selected
individuals by providing fellowship funds to support entry into critical, high-need sectors facing
shortages including disaster relief and recovery, education, public safety, public service, farming
and food security, and services to military families and veterans. The program shall (i) allow host
recipients, including businesses, schools, local governments, and private nonprofit organizations,
to participate in fellowships to meet their needs, assist with financial challenges, and ease
employment demands in their local communities, and (ii) provide opportunities to fellows that
can lead to certifications, licensing, or an associate degree in a career field and, ultimately,
full-time employment.
SECTION 2. Implementation. – A host recipient is eligible for reimbursement of
funds used for a fellowship if the host offers a qualifying fellowship to an individual who is either
within the first two years immediately following (i) high school graduation or completion of
general education development (GED) or (ii) a United States military deployment. Fellowships
that fit the following descriptions are qualifying fellowships:
(1) Disaster relief and recovery. – Supporting governments, nonprofit
organizations, or faith-based organizations in mobilizing resources for
disaster relief and recovery in the State.
(2) Education. – Supporting local school districts, nonprofit organizations, or
faith-based organizations in working as a tutor, early childhood education
assistant, or after school program assistant.
(3) Public safety. – Supporting local police or sheriff departments, nonprofit
organizations, or faith-based organizations in working to reduce crime or
support victims of crime.
(4) Public service. – Supporting county or municipal governments.
(5) Farming and food security. – Supporting small-scale farmers, coalitions,
nonprofit organizations, or faith-based organizations in supporting small-scale
farmers and increasing food security.
(6) Military families and veterans. – Supporting the Veterans Administration,
groups on military bases, professional organizations, fraternal organizations,
*S578-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or nonprofit organizations doing in bolstering active-duty military and their
families, Gold Star families, or veterans.
SECTION 3. Use of Funds. – The NCWorks Commission of the Department of
Commerce shall administer the fellowship program established under this act for host recipients
that are businesses, schools, local governments, or private nonprofit organizations conducting
business in this State and that offer qualifying fellowships to individuals. The funds appropriated
for the program shall be allocated by the Commission to host recipients as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be allocated for the salary and program
expenses of fellows that are in their first two years immediately following high
school graduation or completion of general education development (GED).
(2) Fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be allocated for the salary and program
expenses of fellows that are in their first two years immediately following a
military deployment.
Upon matching funds being made available by a host recipient in accordance with
Section 4 of this act, host recipients may be reimbursed for up to thirty thousand two hundred
dollars ($30,200) per fellow each fiscal year for program expenses, including program
equipment, expenses associated with payroll, mentor stipends, insurance, training, uniforms,
safety equipment, and for the salary and completion award of fellows.
SECTION 4. Matching Funds for Fellowship Cost. – Funds made available to host
recipients for program expenses, salary, and the completion award of fellows shall be matched
on the basis of one dollar ($1.00) in non-State funds for every one dollar ($1.00) in State funds.
Fellows participating in the grant program paid with matching State funds shall be limited to a
weekly rate of pay of six hundred dollars ($600.00). Each fellowship shall be for a period of nine
consecutive months, upon which fellows shall also be paid a completion award of five thousand
dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 5. Fellows Conference. – The NCWorks Commission shall host a
biannual conference of fellows at a location in the State determined in the discretion of the
Commission. The Commission shall invite all individuals who are engaged in fellowships or who
have completed fellowships since the last conference and shall provide an agenda that supports
training and guidance in career development and permanent employment opportunities for
fellows. Of the funds appropriated under this act, the Commission may use up to one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per fellow per year for the biannual fellows conferences.
SECTION 6. Report. – The NCWorks Commission shall submit a report by June 15,
2026, and each year of the program thereafter, to the Senate Committee on Commerce and
Insurance, the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development, and the Fiscal
Research Division on the fellowship program and the use of funds for each type of qualifying
fellowship under Section 2 of this act, matching funds provided by host recipients, as well as
salary data.
SECTION 7. Intent. – It is the intent of the General Assembly to continue growing
the Program at a rate of an additional 100 fellows per year until 1,000 individuals are participating
annually, at which level it is the intent of the General Assembly to maintain the Program.
SECTION 8. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Commerce the sum of one million four hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($1,485,000) in nonrecurring funds to implement the Program in accordance with this act. The
Department of Commerce is encouraged to seek philanthropic contributions from private
foundations to supplant these funds to the extent possible.
SECTION 9. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 578-First Edition